South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3369.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 11, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 1-11-499.  (A) All state agencies and departments, including institutions of higher learning, and all agencies and departments of political subdivisions of this State, including school districts, must prohibit its electronic devices from accessing and using websites and applications that threaten cybersecurity and infrastructure from foreign and domestic threats, such as "TikTok," "WeChat," and other Chinese-owned applications. (B) For executive agencies, the Department of Administration shall adopt procedures necessary to implement the provisions of this section and to secure the State from such threats. Upon request, the department shall assist all other agencies and departments to which subsection (A) applies with security from such threats. (C) For purposes of this section, "electronic device" means any device that enables access to or use of an electronic communication service, remote computing service, or location information service including, but not limited to, a computer, cellular telephone, and any computer-like instrument. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----